Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 4. Communications, Eavesdropping, and Wiretapping.

Cross references. —

For authorized communications interceptions, see AS 12.37.

Legislative history reports. —

For a report on ch. 133, SLA 1966 (HB 353), see 1966 House Journal, pp. 525 — 528.

Collateral references. —

74 Am. Jur. 2d, Telecommunications, §§ 209 — 218.

86 C.J.S. Telecommunications, § 233 et seq.

What constitutes an “interception” of a telephone or similar communication forbidden by the Federal Communications Act (47 USC § 605) or similar state statutes. 9 ALR3d 423.

Sec. 42.20.300.
Unauthorized publication or use of communications.

Except for a party to a private conversation, a person who receives or assists in receiving, or who transmits or assists in transmitting, a private communication may not divulge or publish the existence, contents, substance, purport, effect, or meaning of the communication, except through authorized channels of transmission or reception

to the addressee or the agent or attorney of the addressee;

to a person employed or authorized to forward a communication to its destination;

to proper accounting or distributing officers of the various communicating centers over which the communication may be passed;

to the master of a ship under whom the person is serving;

to another on demand of lawful authority; or

in response to a subpoena issued or order entered by a court of competent jurisdiction.

Except as provided in AS 12.37, a person not authorized by a party to the communication may not intentionally intercept a private communication or divulge or publish the existence, contents, substance, purport, effect, or meaning of the intercepted communication to any person.

A person who is not entitled to a communication but who has received the communication may not use it or any information contained in it for personal benefit or another’s benefit.

A person who has received a communication and who knows or reasonably should know that the communication and the information contained in it was obtained in violation of this section may not divulge or publish the existence, contents, substance, purport, effect, or meaning of the communication or any part of the communication.

A person who has become acquainted with a communication or the information contained in it, and who is not entitled to the communication, may not use the same for personal benefit or another’s benefit, or divulge or publish the existence, contents, substance, purport, effect, or meaning of the communication or any part of the communication.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1966; am §§ 2, 3 ch 61 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

11.60.280

. Renumbered in 1980.

Sec. 42.20.310.
Eavesdropping.

A person may not

use an eavesdropping device to hear or record all or any part of an oral conversation without the consent of a party to the conversation;

use or divulge any information which the person knows or reasonably should know was obtained through the illegal use of an eavesdropping device for personal benefit or another’s benefit;

publish the existence, contents, substance, purport, effect, or meaning of any conversation the person has heard through the illegal use of an eavesdropping device;

divulge, or publish the existence, contents, substance, purport, effect, or meaning of any conversation the person has become acquainted with after the person knows or reasonably should know that the conversation and the information contained in the conversation was obtained through the illegal use of an eavesdropping device.

In this section “eavesdropping device” means any device capable of being used to hear or record oral conversation whether the conversation is conducted in person, by telephone, or by any other means; provided that this definition does not include devices used for the restoration of the deaf or hard-of-hearing to normal or partial hearing.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1966)

Revisor’s notes. —

Subsection (a) was formerly AS 11.60.290. Renumbered in 1980 and designated as (a) in 1989. Subsection (b) was formerly AS 11.60.320. Renumbered as AS

42.20.340

in 1980. Renumbered again in 1989.

Sec. 42.20.320.
Exemptions.

The following activities are exempt from the provisions of AS

42.20.300

and

42.20.310

:

listening to a radio or wireless communications of any sort where the same are publicly made;

hearing conversation when heard by employees of a common carrier by wire incidental to the normal course of their employment in the operation, maintenance, or repair of the equipment of the common carrier by wire, provided the information obtained is not used or divulged in any manner by the hearer;

a broadcast by radio or other means whether it is a live broadcast or recorded for the purpose of later broadcasts of any function where the public is in attendance and the conversations that are overheard are incidental to the main purpose for which the broadcast is then being made;

recording or listening with the aid of any device to an emergency communication made in the normal course of operations by a federal, state, or local law enforcement agency or institutions dealing in emergency services, including hospitals, clinics, ambulance services, fire fighting agencies, a public utility emergency repair facility, civilian defense establishment, or military installations;

inadvertent interception of telephone conversations over party lines;

a peace officer, or a person acting at the direction or request of a peace officer, engaging in conduct authorized by or under AS 12.37;

interception, listening, or recording of communications by a peace officer, or a person acting under the direction or request of a peace officer, in an emergency where the communications are received from a device that intercepts the communications of a person

barricaded and not exiting or surrendering at the direction or request of a peace officer, in circumstances where there is an imminent risk of harm to life or property;

holding another person hostage; or

threatening the imminent illegal use of an explosive;

the interception by a peace officer of an oral communication by use of an electronic, mechanical, or other eavesdropping device that is concealed on or carried on the person of the peace officer and that transmits that oral communication by means of radio to a receiving unit that is monitored by other peace officers, if

the interception and monitoring occurs

during the investigation of a crime or the arrest of a person for a crime; and

for the purpose of ensuring the safety of the peace officer conducting the investigation or making the arrest;

the peace officer who intercepts the oral communication is a party to the communication and has consented to the interception; and

the communication intercepted is not recorded;

interception of a private communication to which a minor is a party by a parent of the minor, except that interception of a private communication between a minor and the minor’s attorney or guardian ad litem or between a minor and a child-custody investigator is not exempt from the provisions of AS

42.20.300

and

42.20.310

; evidence obtained under this paragraph may be

considered by a guardian ad litem or a child custody investigator only if the guardian ad litem or child custody investigator determines that consideration of the evidence is in the best interests of the minor;

admitted in a judicial proceeding, subject to the Alaska Rules of Evidence;

admitted in a judicial proceeding relating to the custody of a minor, subject to the Alaska Rules of Evidence and only if the court determines that admission of the evidence is in the best interests of the minor; or

admitted in an official proceeding that is not a judicial proceeding, subject to the rules of evidence governing the proceeding and only if the official presiding over the proceeding determines that admission of the evidence is in the best interests of the minor.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a person who inadvertently intercepts a private communication that appears to pertain to the commission of a crime may report the information to a law enforcement agency.

In this section, “explosive” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1966; am §§ 4, 5 ch 61 SLA 1993; am §§ 1, 2 ch 146 SLA 1996; am § 4 ch 64 SLA 1999; am § 2 ch 104 SLA 2006)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 11.60.300. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For legislative findings and intent related to the 1999 amendment of subsection (a) by § 4, ch. 64, SLA 1999, see §
1, ch. 64, SLA 1999 in the 1999 Temporary & Special Acts.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter concerning the addition of (a)(7) and (c) of this section by ch. 146, SLA 1996, see 1996 House Journal 2485.

Sec. 42.20.325.
Duty to report.

A person who is an employee of a communications common carrier or of an electronic communication service or of a private investigation agency, and has knowledge of the probable occurrence of conduct that violates a provision of AS

42.20.300

or

42.20.310

shall report the conduct, in writing, to the commissioner of public safety within 30 days after learning of the conduct.

History.

(§ 6 ch 61 SLA 1993)

Sec. 42.20.330.
Penalty.

A person who violates any of the provisions of AS

42.20.300

and

42.20.310

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

History.

(§ 1 ch 133 SLA 1966; am § 7 ch 61 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 11.60.310. Renumbered in 1980.

Cross references. —

For penalty for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 42.20.340.
[Renumbered as AS 42.20.310(b).]

Sec. 42.20.390.
Definitions.

In AS

42.20.300

—

42.20.390

, unless the context otherwise requires,

“communications common carrier” means a business or person engaged as a common carrier for hire in the transmission of communications by wire, cable, satellite, electromagnetic waves, or radio, not including radio broadcasting;

“contents” includes information obtained from a private communication concerning the existence, substance, purport, or meaning of the communication, or the identity of a party of the communication;

“eavesdropping device” means a device or apparatus, including an induction coil, that can be used to intercept an oral, wire, or electronic communication, other than

a hearing aid or similar device used for the restoration of subnormal hearing to not better than normal; or

a telephone instrument, equipment, or facility, or any component of a telephone instrument, equipment, or facility

being used by a provider of wire or electronic communication service in the ordinary course of its business; or

furnished to a subscriber or user by a provider of wire or electronic communication service in the ordinary course of its business and being used by the subscriber or user in the ordinary course of its business;

“electronic communication” means any transfer of signs, signals, writing, images, sounds, data, or intelligence of any nature transmitted in whole or in part by a wire, radio, electromagnetic, photoelectronic or photo-optical system, including a cellular or cordless telephone communication, but does not include

wire or oral communications;

communications made through a tone-only paging device;

communications made through a tracking device consisting of an electronic or mechanical device that permits the tracking of the movement of a person or object; or

communications that are disseminated by the sender with the intent or expectation, or through a method of transmission that is so configured, that the communication is readily accessible to the general public;

“electronic communication service” means a service that provides to users of the service the ability to send or receive wire or electronic communications;

“employee” includes a person who is an officer, agent, or employee of, or a person under contract with, a business or a government entity;

“intercept” means the aural or other acquisition of the contents of an oral, wire, or electronic communication through the use of any electronic, mechanical, or other device, including the acquisition of the contents by simultaneous transmission or by recording;

“minor” means a child under 18 years of age who has not had the disabilities of a minor removed as described in AS

09.55.590

;

“oral communication” means human speech used to communicate information from one party to another;

“parent” means a natural person who is the minor’s natural or adoptive parent, or who has been legally appointed as the minor’s guardian, with parental rights that are not terminated by court order and who is not prohibited by court order from communicating with the minor, or a stepparent as defined in AS

25.23.240

who is not prohibited by court order from communicating with the minor;

“private communication” means an oral, wire, or electronic communication uttered or transmitted by a person who has a reasonable expectation that the communication is not subject to interception;

“wire communication” means human speech used to communicate information from one party to another in whole or in part through the use of facilities for the transmission of communications by wire, cable, or other similar connection between the point of origin and the point of reception furnished or operated by a telephone or radio company for hire as a communications common carrier, but does not include the radio portion of a cordless telephone communication that is transmitted between the cordless telephone handset and the base unit.

History.

(§ 8 ch 61 SLA 1993; am § 3 ch 104 SLA 2006; am § 92 ch 13 SLA 2019)

Revisor's notes. —

Paragraphs (8) and (10) were enacted as paragraphs (11) and (12) respectively, and the existing paragraphs (8), (9), and (10) were renumbered as paragraphs (9), (11), and (12) in 2006 to maintain the alphabetical order of the terms defined.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2019 amendment, effective October 17, 2019, added “unless the context otherwise requires,” at the end of the introductory language, in the introductory language in (3)(B) deleted “or telegraph” following “a telephone” and substituted “a telephone” for “such an” following “any component of”, in (12), deleted “, telegraph,” following “telephone”.

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter on the bill (HB 187) that became
ch. 61, SLA 1993, which enacted this section, see 1993 House Journal 488 — 489.